trunk/apertium-en-ca/apertium-en-ca.en.metadix
    <pardef n="m/an__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -man and add -men">
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bass__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which end in -ss and add -es or nothing (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bus__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which end in -s and add -es or -ses (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ses'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="politics__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remain the same in plural">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wol/f__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remove -f and add -ves or -s(EEUU; LR)">
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ves</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ves'</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fs</l>
          <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="li/fe__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remove -fe and add -ves">
        <p>
          <l>fe</l>
          <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ves</l>
          <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ves'</l>
          <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p/erson__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -erson and add eople or directly add -s (LR; formal/legal English mainly)">
        <p>
          <l>erson</l>
          <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eople</l>
          <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ersons</l>
          <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ephemeri/s__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>des</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>des'</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="staff__n">
      <e c="CP: singular spelling">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e c="CP: plural spelling: invariable singular form">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="CP: alternative plural spelling (not very common): add -s">
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>s'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="child__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e c="CP: add -ren (noun with irregular plural)">
        <p>
          <l>ren</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/ouse__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ouse</l>
          <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e c="CP: add -ice (noun with irregular plural)">
        <p>
          <l>ice</l>
          <r>ouse<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/oot__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oot</l>
          <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e c="CP: add -eet (noun with irregular plural)">
        <p>
          <l>eet</l>
          <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="CP: alternative plural form, not very frequent (same form as singular)">
        <p>
          <l>oot</l>
          <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="br/other__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>other</l>
          <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="CP: add -ethren (alternative plural form; irregular)">
        <p>
          <l>ethren</l>
          <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e c="CP: add -others (regular plural form)">
        <p>
          <l>others</l>
          <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stimul/us__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remove -us and add -i (normally applied to words of Latin origin), or remain the same (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="larva__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which add -e (normally applied to words of Latin origin), or -s (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ind/ex__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remove -ex and add -exes or -ices (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>ex</l>
          <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>exes</l>
          <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ices</l>
          <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="math"><i>math</i><par n="politics__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="brother"><i>br</i><par n="br/other__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bus"><i>bus</i><par n="bus__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="child"><i>child</i><par n="child__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="person, people"><i>p</i><par n="p/erson__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="complex"><i>compl</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="editorial staff"><i>editorial<b/>staff</i><par n="staff__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="foot"><i>f</i><par n="f/oot__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fish"><i>fish</i><par n="bass__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="genius" a="carmentano"><i>geni</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="gentleman"><i>gentlem</i><par n="m/an__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="grandchild"><i>grandchild</i><par n="child__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="index"><i>ind</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="insignia"><i>insignia</i><par n="staff__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="knife"><i>kni</i><par n="li/fe__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="leaf"><i>lea</i><par n="wol/f__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="life"><i>li</i><par n="li/fe__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mouse"><i>m</i><par n="m/ouse__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="Frenchman"><par n="Ff"/><i>renchm</i><par n="m/an__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="midwife"><i>midwi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="news"><i>news</i><par n="politics__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="policeman"><i>policem</i><par n="m/an__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="retina"><i>retina</i><par n="larva__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="shelf"><i>shel</i><par n="wol/f__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="spokeswoman"><i>spokeswom</i><par n="m/an__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="staff"><i>staff</i><par n="staff__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="stimulus"><i>stimul</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="talisman"><i>talism</i><par n="m/an__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="thief"><i>thie</i><par n="wol/f__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="handkerchief"><i>handkerchie</i><par n="wol/f__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="tuna"><i>tuna</i><par n="staff__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="wife"><i>wi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bonus"><i>bonus</i><par n="bass__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="expertise"><i>expertise</i><par n="politics__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="amoeba"><i>amoeba</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="apex"><i>ap</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="glabella"><i>glabella</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="glans"><i>glans</i><par n="politics__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="narthex"><i>narth</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="psychopedagogics"><i>psychopedagogics</i><par n="politics__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="pupa"><i>pupa</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="tarantula"><i>tarantula</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="uvula"><i>uvula</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
<e lm="wolf"><i>wol</i><par n="wol/f__n"/>    </e>
<e lm="fisherman"><i>fisherm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marquis"><i>marquis</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marquess"><i>marquess</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marchioness"><i>marchioness</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jellyfish" a="greenbreen"><i>jellyfish</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scarf" a="greenbreen"><i>scar</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dwarf" a="greenbreen"><i>dwar</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ramen" a="greenbreen"><i>ramen</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
    <e lm="penknife" a="greenbreen"><i>penkni</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grouse" a="greenbreen"><i>grouse</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
    <e lm="salmon" a="greenbreen"><i>salmon</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dormouse" a="greenbreen"><i>dorm</i><par n="m/ouse__n"/></e>
    <e lm="radius" a="greenbreen"><i>radi</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fluid mechanics" a="greenbreen"><i>fluid<b/>mechanics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ephemeris" a="greenbreen"><i>ephemeri</i><par n="ephemeri/s__n"/></e>
<e lm="crossbowman"><i>crossbowm</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="columella"><i>columella</i><par n="larva__n"/></e>
<e lm="criminalistics"><i>criminalistics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="spandex"><i>spand</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="oleodynamics"><i>oleodynamics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
<e lm="remex"><i>rem</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="telex"><i>tel</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/></e>
<e lm="post office box"><i>post<b/>office<b/>box</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
<e lm="businesswoman"><i>businesswom</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abruptness" a="eleka"><i>abruptness</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
